Wisconsin, session 2025, SB787.
do enact as follows:SB787,11Section 1. 421.202 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB787,2,52421.202 (6) Consumer credit transactions in which the amount financed 3exceeds $25,000 $32,500, motor vehicle consumer leases in which the total lease 4obligation exceeds $25,000 $32,500, or other consumer transactions in which the 5cash price exceeds $25,000 $32,500.SB787,26Section 2. 421.202 (6) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 7(this act), section 1, is amended to read:SB787,2,118421.202 (6) Consumer credit transactions in which the amount financed 9exceeds $32,500 $40,000, motor vehicle consumer leases in which the total lease 10obligation exceeds $32,500 $40,000, or other consumer transactions in which the 11cash price exceeds $32,500 $40,000.SB787,312Section 3. 421.202 (6) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 13(this act), section 2, is amended to read:SB787,3,214421.202 (6) Consumer credit transactions in which the amount financed 15exceeds $40,000 $50,000, motor vehicle consumer leases in which the total lease 16obligation exceeds $40,000 $50,000, or other consumer transactions in which the 17cash price exceeds $40,000 $50,000. Beginning 5 years after the effective date of 18this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], and every 5 years thereafter, the dollar 19amounts specified in this subsection shall be adjusted to reflect any changes in the 20U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as 1determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the preceding 5-year period, 2rounded up to the nearest thousand dollars.SB787,43Section 4. 799.01 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB787,3,54799.01 (1) (c) Replevins. Actions for replevin under ss. 810.01 to 810.13 where 5the value of the property claimed does not exceed $10,000 $15,000.SB787,56Section 5. 799.01 (1) (c) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 7(this act), section 4, is amended to read:SB787,3,98799.01 (1) (c) Replevins. Actions for replevin under ss. 810.01 to 810.13 where 9the value of the property claimed does not exceed $15,000 $20,000.SB787,610Section 6. 799.01 (1) (c) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 11(this act), section 5, is amended to read:SB787,3,1312799.01 (1) (c) Replevins. Actions for replevin under ss. 810.01 to 810.13 where 13the value of the property claimed does not exceed $20,000 $25,000.SB787,714Section 7. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:SB787,3,1715799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 16claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 17where the amount claimed is $5,000 $15,000 or less.SB787,818Section 8. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 19.... (this act), section 7, is amended to read:SB787,3,2220799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 21claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 22where the amount claimed is $15,000 $20,000 or less.SB787,91Section 9. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2.... (this act), section 8, is amended to read:SB787,4,53799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 4claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 5where the amount claimed is $20,000 $25,000 or less.SB787,106Section 10. 799.01 (1) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB787,4,87799.01 (1) (d) Other civil actions. (intro.) Other civil actions where the 8amount claimed is $10,000 $15,000 or less, if the actions or proceedings are:SB787,119Section 11. 799.01 (1) (d) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 10Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 10, is amended to read:SB787,4,1211799.01 (1) (d) Other civil actions. (intro.) Other civil actions where the 12amount claimed is $15,000 $20,000 or less, if the actions or proceedings are:SB787,1213Section 12. 799.01 (1) (d) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 14Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 11, is amended to read:SB787,4,1615799.01 (1) (d) Other civil actions. (intro.) Other civil actions where the 16amount claimed is $20,000 $25,000 or less, if the actions or proceedings are:SB787,1317Section 13. 799.01 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB787,4,2318799.01 (3) Adjustments. Beginning 5 years after the effective date of this 19subsection .... [LRB inserts date], and every 5 years thereafter, the dollar amounts 20specified in sub. (1) (c), (cr), and (d) shall be adjusted to reflect any changes in the 21U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as 22determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the preceding 5-year period, 23rounded up to the nearest thousand dollars.SB787,1424Section 14. Initial applicability.SB787,5,31(1) The treatment of ss. 421.202 (6) (by Section 1) and 799.01 (1) (c) (by 2Section 4), (cr) (by Section 7), and (d) (intro.) (by Section 10) first applies to 3actions commenced or claims made on the effective date of this subsection.SB787,5,64(2) The treatment of ss. 421.202 (6) (by Section 2) and 799.01 (1) (c) (by 5Section 5), (cr) (by Section 8), and (d) (intro.) (by Section 11) first applies to 6actions commenced or claims made on the effective date of this subsection.SB787,5,97(3) The treatment of ss. 421.202 (6) (by Section 3) and 799.01 (1) (c) (by 8Section 6), (cr) (by Section 9), and (d) (intro.) (by Section 12) first applies to 9actions commenced or claims made on the effective date of this subsection.SB787,1510Section 15. Effective dates. This act takes effect on January 1, 2027, 11except as follows:SB787,5,1412(1) The treatment of ss. 421.202 (6) (by Section 2) and 799.01 (1) (c) (by 13Section 5), (cr) (by Section 8), and (d) (intro.) (by Section 11) and Section 14 (2) 14of this act take effect on January 1, 2028.SB787,5,1715(2) The treatment of ss. 421.202 (6) (by Section 3) and 799.01 (1) (c) (by 16Section 6), (cr) (by Section 9) and (d) (intro.) (by Section 12) and (3) and Section 1714 (3) of this act take effect on January 1, 2029.SB787,5,1818